Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6819
Qualified property, defined.

Qualified property means any tangible property of a type subject to depreciation, amortization, or other recovery under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or the components of such property, that will be located and used at the project. Qualified property does not include (1) aircraft, barges, motor vehicles, railroad rolling stock, or watercraft or (2) property that is rented by the taxpayer qualifying under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act to another person. Qualified property of the taxpayer located at the residence of an employee working in Nebraska from his or her residence on tasks interdependent with the work performed at the project shall be deemed located and used at the project.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 19.